Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-136
Sheriffs; fees; audit and allowance.

The county boards of the several counties in this state are hereby authorized to audit and allow the fees that may be fixed by law for services that may hereafter be performed by sheriffs in their respective counties in the arrest and examination of offenders charged with felonies.

Laws 1871, § 1, p. 133;

Laws 1903, c. 33, § 1, p. 282;

R.S.1913, § 2640;

C.S.1922, § 2402;

C.S.1929, § 33-141;

R.S.1943, § 33-136;

Laws 1969, c. 276, § 1, p. 1041;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 223;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 35.

This section is constitutional and not in conflict with other statutory provisions. Boggs v. Board of Commissioners of Washington County, 10 Neb. 297, 4 N.W. 984 (1880).